North Carolina statutes. Chapter 54. Cooperative Organizations.
Article 14C. Powers of Credit Union.

§ 54-109.21.
General powers.

A credit union may:

Make contracts;

Sue and be sued;

Adopt and use a common seal and alter the seal;

Acquire, lease, hold and dispose of property, either in whole or in part, necessary or incidental to its operations;

At the discretion of the board of directors, require the payment of an entrance fee or annual membership fee, or both, of any person admitted to membership;

Receive savings from its members in the form of shares, deposits, or special-purpose thrift accounts;

Lend its funds to its members as provided in Articles 14A to 14L of this Chapter;

Borrow from any source in accordance with policy established by the board of directors;

Discount and sell any eligible obligations, subject to rules adopted by the Administrator;

Sell all or substantially all of its assets or purchase all or substantially all of the assets of another financial institution, subject to the approval of the Administrator of Credit Unions;

Invest surplus funds as provided in Articles 14A to 14L of this Chapter;

Make deposits in legally chartered banks, savings institutions, trust companies and central-type credit union organizations;

Assess charges to members in accordance with the bylaws for failure to meet properly their obligations to the credit union;

Hold membership in other credit unions organized under Articles 14A to 14L of this Chapter or other acts, and in other associations and organizations composed of credit unions;

Declare dividends; pay interest on deposits and pay interest refunds to borrowers as provided in Articles 14A to 14L of this Chapter;

Sell travelers checks and money orders and charge a reasonable fee for such services, provided the travelers checks are payable at institutions other than a credit union;

Perform tasks and missions requested by the federal government or this State or any agency or political subdivision thereof, when approved by the board of directors and not inconsistent with Articles 14A to 14L of this Chapter;

Act as fiscal agent for and receive deposits from the federal government, this State, or any agency or political subdivision thereof;

Contribute to, support, or participate in any nonprofit service facility whose services will benefit the credit union or its membership subject to rules adopted by the Administrator;

Make donations or contributions to any civic, charitable or community organization as authorized by the board of directors, subject to such regulations as are prescribed by the Administrator;

Act as a custodian of qualified pension funds if permitted by federal law;

Purchase or make available insurance for its directors, officers, agents, employees, and members; insurance may be provided through any insurance company or through any subsidiary insurance company owned by the credit union; and

Facilitate its members’ purchase of goods and services in a manner which promotes the purposes of the credit union.

The board of directors may expel from the corporation any member who has not carried out the engagement the member made with the corporation, has been convicted of a felony or crime involving moral turpitude, or neglects or refuses to comply with the provisions of this Article or of the bylaws. The Board may, after notice and hearing as provided in this subdivision, expel from the corporation any member who because of the member’s intemperance disrupts the activities of the credit union or who because of the member’s habitual neglect of financial obligations reflects discredit upon the credit union. No member shall be expelled until informed in writing of the charges made and given an opportunity, after reasonable notice, to be heard.

Engage in activity permitted under this subdivision. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, the Administrator of Credit Unions, subject to the advice and consent of the Credit Union Commission, and upon a finding that action is necessary to preserve and protect the welfare of credit unions and to promote the general economy of the State, may adopt rules allowing State-chartered credit unions to engage in any activity in which they could engage if they were federally chartered credit unions.

Subject to rules adopted by the Administrator, act as trustee or custodian, and receive reasonable compensation for so acting, under any written trust instrument or custodial agreement created or organized and forming a part of a deferred compensation plan for its members or groups or organizations of its members, provided the funds of the plans are invested in savings or deposits of the credit union. All funds held may be commingled for the purpose of investment, but individual records shall be kept by the credit union for each participant and shall show in proper detail all transactions engaged in under authority of this subdivision.

A member may withdraw from a credit union by filing a written notice of intent to withdraw.

The amounts paid in on shares or deposits by an expelled or withdrawing member, with any dividends credited to the shares and any interest accrued on the deposits to the date of expulsion or withdrawal shall be paid to the member, but in the order of expulsion or withdrawal, and only as funds therefor become available, after deducting any amounts due to the credit union by the member. The member shall have no other or further right in the credit union or to any of its benefits, but the expulsion or withdrawal shall not operate to relieve the member from any remaining liability to the credit union.

History.

1915, c. 115, ss. 5, 16, 17, 23; C.S., ss. 5216-5218, 5231; 1925, c. 73, ss. 3, 10; 1935, c. 87; 1965, c. 956, s. 8; 1975, c. 538, s. 1; 1977, c. 559, s. 5; 1983, c. 568, s. 2; 1991, c. 651, s. 3; 2011-221, s. 1.

§ 54-109.22.
Incidental powers.

A credit union may exercise such incidental powers such as are necessary or requisite to enable it to promote and carry on most effectively its purposes.

History.

1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§§ 54-109.23 through 54-109.25.

Reserved for future codification purposes.